Utah statutes.
58-67-304.   License renewal requirements.

(1)  As a condition precedent for license renewal, each licensee shall, during each two-year licensure cycle or other cycle defined by division rule:

(a)  complete qualified continuing professional education requirements in accordance with the number of hours and standards defined by division rule made in collaboration with the board;

(b)  appoint a contact person for access to medical records and an alternate contact person for access to medical records in accordance with Subsection 58-67-302(1)(j); and

(c)  if the licensee practices medicine in a location with no other persons licensed under this chapter, provide some method of notice to the licensee's patients of the identity and location of the contact person and alternate contact person for the licensee.

(2)  If a renewal period is extended or shortened under Section 58-67-303, the continuing education hours required for license renewal under this section are increased or decreased proportionally.

